Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-334
Commission; participation with other public entities; wildlife habitats; expenditures authorized.

The commission may participate with the natural resources districts and other public agencies, pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, for the acquisition on a willing-seller willing-buyer basis only, leasing, taking of easements, development, management, and enhancement of wildlife habitats. The commission may expend, transfer, or reimburse participants with money received from the sale of hunting and fishing permits and habitat stamps for such purposes under policies established by the commission. The commission may use money received pursuant to this section for the matching of federal funds under section 37-901.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-109;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 92;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 71.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.